test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tasoTS_gt-norm.yaml
# NB! Following stem-final modifications take place in AccPl stem: ва -> би, ка -> ци, га -> зи
# #+Use/SpellNoSugg
  Noun - таˮ: # Noun 'extra /(fin) таˮ' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi s+o/
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom: таˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc: тасмʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen: тасʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat: татʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [такана, такна]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl: такад
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros: таˮамна
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom: тасˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc: тасо
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen: тасоˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat: такˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [такаˮна, такˮна]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl: такат
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros: тасоˮмана
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: таˮан
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: такан
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [таканан, такнан]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [такадан, такдан]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: таˮамнан
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [такаюн, такюн]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [такаюн, такюн]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [такаюн, такюн]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тасон
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тасон
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тасоˮн
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: такаˮн
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [такаˮнан, такˮнан]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [такатан, тактан]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тасоˮманан
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: таˮал
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тат
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тат
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: таканд
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [такананд, такнанд]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [такаданд, такданд]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: таˮамнанд
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [такаюд, такюд]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [такаюд, такюд]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [такают, такют]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тасод
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тасод
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тасот
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: такат
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [такаˮнат, такˮнат]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [такатат, тактат]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тасоˮманат
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тата
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тата
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тата
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: таканда
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [такананда, такнанда]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [такаданда, такданда]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: таˮамнанда
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [такаюда, такюда]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [такаюда, такюда]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [такаюта, такюта]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тасода
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тасода
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тасота
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [таката, такта]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [такаˮната, такˮната]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [такатата, тактата]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тасоˮманата
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: таˮмиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: таˮми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: таˮмиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: таˮми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: таˮниʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: таˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [таканиʼ, такниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [такани, такни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [такананиʼ, такнаниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [таканани, такнани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [такаданиʼ, такданиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [такадани, такдани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: таˮамнаниʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: таˮамнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [такаюниʼ, такюниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [такаюни, такюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [такаюниʼ, такюниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [такаюни, такюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [такаюниʼ, такюниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [такаюни, такюни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тасониʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тасони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тасониʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тасони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тасоˮниʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тасоˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [такаˮниʼ, такˮниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [такаˮни, такˮни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [такаˮнаниʼ, такˮнаниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [такаˮнани, такˮнани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [такатаниʼ, тактаниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [такатани, тактани] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тасоˮмананиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тасоˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: таˮлиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: такандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [таканандиʼ, такнандиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [такадандиʼ, такдандиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: таˮамнандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [такаютиʼ, такютиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тасотиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [такатиʼ, тактиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [такаˮнатиʼ, такˮнатиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [такататиʼ, тактатиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тасоˮманатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: такандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [таканандиʼ, такнандиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [такадандиʼ, такдандиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: таˮамнандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [такаютиʼ, такютиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тасодиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тасотиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [такатиʼ, тактиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [такаˮнатиʼ, такˮнатиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [такататиʼ, тактатиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тасоˮманатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: таˮнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [таканаˮ, такнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [такананаˮ, такнанаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [такаданаˮ, такданаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: таˮамнанаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [такаюнаˮ, такюнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [такаюнаˮ, такюнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [такаюнаˮ, такюнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тасонаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тасонаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тасоˮнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [такаˮнаˮ, такˮнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [такаˮнанаˮ, такˮнанаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [такатанаˮ, тактанаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тасоˮмананаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: таˮлаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: такандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [таканандаˮ, такнандаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [такадандаˮ, такдандаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: таˮамнандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [такаюдаˮ, такюдаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [такаюдаˮ, такюдаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [такаютаˮ, такютаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тасодаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тасодаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тасотаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [такатаˮ, тактаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [такаˮнатаˮ, такˮнатаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [такататаˮ, тактатаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тасоˮманатаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: такандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [таканандоʼ, такнандоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [такадандоʼ, такдандоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: таˮамнандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [такаюдоʼ, такюдоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [такаюдоʼ, такюдоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [такаютоʼ, такютоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тасодоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тасодоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тасотоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [такатоʼ, тактоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [такаˮнатоʼ, такˮнатоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [такататоʼ, тактатоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тасоˮманатоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Abs: тат
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [татав, татув]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [татав, татув]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: татан
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: татар
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: татамд
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: татанд
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [татада, татда]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [татамда, татмда]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [татанда, татнда]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [татамиʼ, татмиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [татами, татми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [татамиʼ, татмиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [татами, татми] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [татаниʼ, татниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [татани, татни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: татриʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [татамдиʼ, татмдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [татандиʼ, татндиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [татадиʼ, татдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [татамдиʼ, татмдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [татандиʼ, татндиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: татваˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: татваˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [татанаˮ, татнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: татраˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [татамдаˮ, татмдаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [татандаˮ, татндаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [татадоʼ, татдоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [татамдоʼ, татмдоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [татандоʼ, татндоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: татмʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тат
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: таˮниʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: татамзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: татась
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таць
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: таˮнинзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: татинзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: таканзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: таˮмаць
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: татаць
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасаць
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮал
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тата
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮмиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮлиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮлаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮмась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮлась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: татась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮминзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮлинзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: татинзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮмаць
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таˮлаць
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: татонзь
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюн, такюн]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюд, такюд]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюда, такюда]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюниʼ, такюниʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюдиʼ, такюдиʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюнаˮ, такюнаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюдаˮ, такюдаˮ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [такаюдоʼ, такюдоʼ]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюнась, такюнась]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдась, такюдась]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдась, такюдась]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюнинзь, такюнинзь]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдинзь, такюдинзь]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдинзь, такюдинзь]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюнаць, такюнаць]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдаць, такюдаць]
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [такаюдонзь, такюдонзь]
